src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@põnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põnev MAGUS ;
põristav+A:põristav MAGUS ;
põrmustav+A:põrmustav MAGUS ;
põrnitsev+A:põrnitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@põrpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´õrpiv MAGUS ;
põrutav+A:põrutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pädev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pädev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pälviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´äl,viv MAGUS ;
pärandatav+A:pärandatav MAGUS ;
pärinev+A:pärinev MAGUS ;
päritav+A:päritav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pärssiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ärssiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´öörav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´öörduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´öörlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pürgiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ürgiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@püsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@püsiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rabav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rabav MAGUS ;
rabelev+A:rabelev MAGUS ;
ragisev+A:ragisev MAGUS ;
rahuldav+A:rahuldav MAGUS ;
rahustav+A:rahustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@raiuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´aiuv MAGUS ;
rajatav+A:rajatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rajav MAGUS ;
rakendatav+A:rakendatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rappuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´appuv MAGUS ;
raskendav+A:raskendav MAGUS ;
ratsutav+A:ratsutav MAGUS ;
ravitav+A:ravitav MAGUS ;
realiseeritav+A:realiseeritav MAGUS ;
rebitav+A:rebitav MAGUS ;
reguleeritav+A:reguleeritav MAGUS ;
reguleeriv+A:regul´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@reisiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´eisiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rentiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´en,tiv MAGUS ;
resümeeriv+A:resüm´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@riivav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´iivav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rikkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´ikkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rippuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´ippuv MAGUS ;
riskeeriv+A:risk´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@riskiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´iskiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@roiutav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@roiutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@roniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@roniv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@roomav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´oomav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rusuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rusuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ruttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´uttav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rõhuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rõhuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rõkkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´õkkav MAGUS ;
rõõmustav+A:rõõmustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rändav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´ändav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@rääkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´ääkiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ründav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´ündav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saabuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aabuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saadav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aadav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aav MAGUS ;
saavutatav+A:saavutatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sadav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sadav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sagiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sagiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´al,liv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@salvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´alvav MAGUS ;
sarnanev+A:sarnanev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sebiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sebiv MAGUS ;
seeditav+A:seeditav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seeduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eeduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@segav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@segav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eilav MAGUS ;
seletatav+A:seletatav MAGUS ;
selgitav+A:sel,gitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seltsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´el,tsiv MAGUS ;
semutsev+A:semutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seonduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eonduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seostuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eostuv MAGUS ;
sepistatav+A:sepistatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@siduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@siduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sigiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sigiv MAGUS ;
sihitav+A:sihitav MAGUS ;
silitav+A:silitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sirav MAGUS ;
sisaldav+A:sisaldav MAGUS ;
sisalduv+A:sisalduv MAGUS ;
sisendav+A:sisendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@siuglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´iuglev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sobiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sobiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@solvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´olvav MAGUS ;
soodustav+A:soodustav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@soosiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´oosiv MAGUS ;
soovitatav+A:soovitatav MAGUS ;
soovitav+A:soovitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sooviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ooviv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sorav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sorav MAGUS ;
sugereeriv+A:suger´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@suhtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´uhtlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@suitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´uitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sujuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sujuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sulav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sulav MAGUS ;
suletav+A:suletav MAGUS ;
sumisev+A:sumisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sundiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´un,div MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@surev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@surev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@surmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´urmav MAGUS ;
suunatav+A:suunatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@suunduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´uunduv MAGUS ;
suurendav+A:suurendav MAGUS ;
suurenev+A:suurenev MAGUS ;
sõlmitav+A:sõl,mitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sõltuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´õltuv MAGUS ;
sädelev+A:sädelev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sähviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ähviv MAGUS ;
säilitav+A:säilitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@säiliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´äiliv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@särav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@särav MAGUS ;
sätendav+A:sätendav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sööbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ööbiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@söödav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´öödav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sööv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ööv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sügav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sügav MAGUS ;
sülitav+A:sülitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sündiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ün,div MAGUS ;
sünteesiv+A:sünt´eesiv MAGUS ;
sütitav+A:süt,itav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@süttiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´üt,tiv MAGUS ;
süvenev+A:süvenev MAGUS ;
süüdistatav+A:süüdistatav MAGUS ;
süüdistav+A:süüdistav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@süüdiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´üüdiv MAGUS ;
šokeeriv+A:šok´eeriv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taanduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aanduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taaruv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aaruv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taastuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aastuv MAGUS ;
tabatav+A:tabatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tabav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tabav MAGUS ;
tagandatav+A:tagandatav MAGUS ;
taganev+A:taganev MAGUS ;
tagastatav+A:tagastatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tagav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tagav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taipav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aipav MAGUS ;
tajutav+A:tajutav MAGUS ;
takerduv+A:takerduv MAGUS ;
takistav+A:takistav MAGUS ;
taltsutatav+A:taltsutatav MAGUS ;
talutav+A:talutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tammuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ammuv MAGUS ;
tantsisklev+A:tan,tsisklev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@taotlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´aotlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tarbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´arbiv MAGUS ;
targutav+A:targutav MAGUS ;
targutlev+A:targutlev MAGUS ;
tarvitatav+A:tarvitatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tasuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tasuv MAGUS ;
taunitav+A:taunitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tauniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´auniv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@teatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´eatav MAGUS ;
teenindav+A:teenindav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@teeniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´eeniv MAGUS ;
tegelev+A:tegelev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tegev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tegev MAGUS ;
tegutsev+A:tegutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tehtav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ehtav MAGUS ;
tekitav+A:tekitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tekkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ekkiv MAGUS ;
teostatav+A:t´eostatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@teostav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´eostav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@terav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@terav MAGUS ;
tervitatav+A:tervitatav MAGUS ;
tihenev+A:tihenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tilkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ilkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tingiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ingiv MAGUS ;
toetatav+A:t´oetatav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toetuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oetuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toibuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oibuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toimiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oimiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toimuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oimuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oodav MAGUS ;
toodetav+A:toodetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toov+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oov MAGUS ;
toretsev+A:toretsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@torkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´orkav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@torkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´orkiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tormav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ormav MAGUS ;
tormitsev+A:tormitsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tormlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ormlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tossav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ossav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@trotsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tr´ot,siv MAGUS ;
tudisev+A:tudisev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tugev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tugev MAGUS ;
tuginev+A:tuginev MAGUS ;
tuhisev+A:tuhisev MAGUS ;
tujutsev+A:tujutsev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tukkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ukkuv MAGUS ;
tulenev+A:tulenev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tulev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tulev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tulvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ulvav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tundlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´undlev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tunduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´unduv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tungiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ungiv MAGUS ;
